Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.080

Revolving fund—Administration of fund—Use—School district requisition as prerequisite.

The surplus and donated food commodities revolving fund shall be administered by the state superintendent of public instruction and be used solely for the purchase or other acquisition, including transportation, storage and other cost, of surplus or donable food commodities from the federal government. The superintendent may purchase or otherwise acquire such commodities only after requisition by a school district requesting such commodities.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.050. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 92 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.30.050, 28.30.050.]